Idaho, session 2025, S1044.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The Legislature finds that cursive
handwriting is a vital skill. This act ensures that all Idaho public school
students develop proficiency in cursive handwriting.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 16, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1638, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1638. CURSIVE HANDWRITING PROFICIENCY REQUIREMENT IN IDAHO PUB-
LIC SCHOOLS. (1) Idaho public schools shall require proficiency in cursive
handwriting for students by the end of grade 5. "Cursive handwriting profi-
ciency" means that students can write legibly in cursive.
(2) The state board of education shall require cursive handwriting in-
struction for students by grade 3.
(3) The state department of education shall:
(a) Set benchmarks for cursive handwriting proficiency;
(b) Provide guidelines and examples for assessing student progress;
and
(c) Share resources to assist teachers in providing effective cursive
handwriting instruction.
(4) All Idaho public schools shall be in compliance with the provisions
of this section by the start of the 2025-2026 school year.
(5) Students who do not achieve cursive handwriting proficiency by the
end of grade 5 shall receive additional instruction until such proficiency
is demonstrated.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.